Utah statutes.
73-18c-307.   Claims adjustment by persons with owner's or operator's security other than insurance.

(1)  An owner or operator of a motorboat who maintains owner's or operator's security by a means other than an insurance policy under Section 73-18c-102, shall refer all bodily injury claims against the owner's or operator's security to an independent adjuster licensed under Title 31A, Chapter 26, Insurance Adjusters, or to an attorney.

(2)  Unless otherwise provided by contract, any motorboat claim adjustment expense incurred by a person maintaining owner's or operator's security by a means other than an insurance policy under Section 73-18c-102, shall be paid by the person who maintains this type of owner's or operator's security.

(3)  Owners and operators of motorboats maintaining owner's or operator's security by a means other than an insurance policy under Section 73-18c-102 are subject to the claim adjustment provisions of Title 31A, Chapter 26, Part 3, Claim Practices, in connection with claims against persons which arise out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of a motorboat.



Amended by Chapter 211, 2006 General Session

